Utah statutes.
36-12-18.   Offices for Legislative Management Committee and professional legislative staff -- Hours -- Library facilities available -- Documents, reports, and information available.

The Legislative Management Committee and the professional legislative staff shall be provided with adequate quarters in the State Capitol Complex convenient to the members of the Legislature and other persons having official business with them.  The offices shall be open during the time provided by law for other state offices, and when the Legislature is in session, at such hours as are convenient to the legislators.  The facilities of the state library and other libraries maintained by the state shall be available for use by all legislative committees and subcommittees and the professional legislative staff.  Each department, division, commission, agency, or other instrumentality of state government shall furnish to all the legislative committees and subcommittees and the professional legislative staff upon request any document, reports, or information available within the department.



Amended by Chapter 121, 2007 General Session

